Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.020

Director to act under authority of the department's division of banks.

All the powers, duties, and functions granted to or imposed upon the director under this title shall be exercised under the direction and supervision of the department's division of banks, subject to the delegation, oversight, and supervision of the director. Wherever provision is made in any law in effect on January 5, 2015, authorizing and permitting the director to adopt rules and regulations with respect to any actions or things required to be done under this title, such rules and regulations shall be made by the department's division of banks, and the words "the director" used in such statutes authorizing the director to make rules and regulations, shall be construed to mean the department's division of banks, and the words "department" substituted in such statutes for "director."

[ 2014 c 37 s 335.]